Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BIOMASS ENERGY FACILITY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the renewable development account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to Liberty Diversified International to plan and construct an anaerobic digester or a biomass thermal generation facility in the city of Becker. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "anaerobic digester" means a facility that uses diverted food and organic waste to generate renewable natural gas and biochar; new text end new text begin (2) "biochar" means a solid substance, made from burning organic material, that sequesters carbon and is capable of being used as a soil application; and new text end new text begin (3) "biomass thermal generation facility" means a facility that generates energy for commercial heat or industrial process heat from the combustion of organic material. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end